Mississippi, session 2026, HB1421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 19-21-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 19-21-105.  (1)  Each coroner elected in the 1987 general election and thereafter shall attend the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory and State Medical Examiner Death Investigation Training School provided for in subsection (5) of Section 41-61-57, and shall successfully complete subsequent testing on the subject material prior to taking the oath of office.  If the elected coroner fails to successfully complete the school and testing, he or she shall not be eligible to take the oath of office. (2)  In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, each person elected to the office of coroner on or after July 1, 2026, shall successfully complete a minimum of fifty (50) hours of training approved or provided by the Center for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) Collaborating Office for Medical Examiners and Coroners. The training shall be completed online or in-person. (3)  Proof of successful completion of the training required under subsection (2) of this section shall be filed with the county clerk and the board of supervisors prior to the coroner taking the oath of office. If the elected coroner fails to satisfy the training requirement under subsection (2) of this section, the elected coroner shall not be eligible to take the oath of office. ( * * *24)  Upon successful completion of the death investigation training school and the CDC training, the coroner shall take the oath of office, and he or she then shall be designated the chief county medical examiner or chief county medical examiner investigator, as provided in subsection (2) of Section 41-61-57, and shall perform the duties of such office as required by law. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.